Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.010

Enforcement of rules of conduct—Due process guarantees—Computation of days for short-term and long-term suspensions.

Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, shall:

(1) Enforce the rules prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction for the government of schools, pupils, and certificated employees.

(2) Adopt and make available to each pupil, teacher and parent in the district reasonable written rules regarding pupil conduct, discipline, and rights, including but not limited to short-term suspensions as referred to in RCW 28A.600.015 and suspensions in excess of ten consecutive days. Such rules shall not be inconsistent with any of the following: Federal statutes and regulations, state statutes, common law, and the rules of the superintendent of public instruction. The board's rules shall include such substantive and procedural due process guarantees as prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.600.015. When such rules are made available to each pupil, teacher, and parent, they shall be accompanied by a detailed description of rights, responsibilities, and authority of teachers and principals with respect to the discipline of pupils as prescribed by state statutory law, the superintendent of public instruction, and the rules of the school district.

For the purposes of this subsection, computation of days included in "short-term" and "long-term" suspensions shall be determined on the basis of consecutive school days.

(3) Suspend, expel, or discipline pupils in accordance with RCW 28A.600.015.

[ 2006 c 263 s 901; 1997 c 265 s 4; 1990 c 33 s 496; 1979 ex.s. c 173 s 2; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 97 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 254 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 268 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.101. Prior: 1969 c 53 s 1, part; 1967 ex.s. c 29 s 1, part; 1967 c 12 s 1, part; 1965 ex.s. c 49 s 1, part; 1963 c 104 s 1, part; 1963 c 5 s 1, part; 1961 c 305 s 1, part; 1961 c 237 s 1, part; 1961 c 66 s 1, part; 1955 c 68 s 2, part. Formerly RCW 28A.58.101, 28.58.100(2), (6).]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1997 c 265: See note following RCW 13.40.160.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 254: See note following RCW 28A.410.120.